Maryland, session 2026, HB1086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
4–401.
Except as provided in § 4–402 of this subtitle, and subject to the venue provisions of
Title 6 of this article, the District Court has exclusive original civil jurisdiction in:
(13) A proceeding for a civil infraction under § 21–202.1, § 21–502.2, §
21–704.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3
of the Transportation Article or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article;
7–302.
(e) (1) (i) A citation issued under § 21–202.1, § 21–502.2, § 21–706.1, §
21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation
Article shall provide that the person receiving the citation may elect to stand trial by
notifying the issuing agency of the person’s intention to stand trial at least 5 days before
the date of payment as set forth in the citation.
(ii) On receipt of the notice to stand trial, the agency shall forward
to the District Court having venue a copy of the citation and a copy of the notice from the
person who received the citation indicating the person’s intention to stand trial.
(iii) On receipt thereof, the District Court shall schedule the case for
trial and notify the defendant of the trial date under procedures adopted by the Chief Judge
of the District Court.
(2) (i) A citation issued as the result of any of the following systems or
cameras controlled by a political subdivision shall provide that, in an uncontested case, the
penalty shall be paid directly to that political subdivision:
1. A vehicle height monitoring system;
2. A traffic control signal monitoring system;
3. A speed monitoring system;
4. A work zone speed control system;
5. A stop sign monitoring system;
6. A CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEM;

HOUSE BILL 1086 3
7. A school bus monitoring camera;
[7.] 8. A bus lane monitoring system; or
[8.] 9. A noise abatement monitoring system.
(ii) A citation issued as the result of any of the following systems or
cameras controlled by a political subdivision shall provide that, in a contested case, the
penalty shall be paid directly to the District Court:
1. A vehicle height monitoring system;
2. A traffic control signal monitoring system;
3. A speed monitoring system;
4. A work zone speed control system;
5. A stop sign monitoring system;
6. A CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEM;
7. A school bus monitoring camera;
[7.] 8. A bus lane monitoring system; or
[8.] 9. A noise abatement monitoring system.
(iii) A citation issued as the result of any of the following systems or
cameras controlled by a State agency shall provide that, in an uncontested or contested
case, the penalty shall be paid directly to the District Court:
1. A traffic control signal monitoring system;
2. A work zone speed control system;
3. A speed monitoring system; or
4. A bus lane monitoring system.
(3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this
paragraph and paragraph (6) of this subsection, civil penalties resulting from citations
issued using a vehicle height monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system,
speed monitoring system, work zone speed control system, stop sign monitoring system,
CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEM, school bus monitoring camera, bus lane monitoring
system, or a noise abatement monitoring system that are collected by the District Court

HOUSE BILL 1086
shall be collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and distributed in
accordance with § 12–118 of the Transportation Article.
(ii) 1. The fines collected by the District Court as a result of
violations enforced by speed monitoring systems on Interstate 695 in Baltimore County and
Interstate 83 in Baltimore County shall be remitted to the Comptroller for distribution to
the State Highway Administration to be used solely to:
A. Recover the cost of implementing and administering the
speed monitoring systems on Interstate 695 in Baltimore County and Interstate 83 in
Baltimore County; and
B. Assist in covering the cost of roadway and safety
improvements on Interstate 695 in Baltimore County and Interstate 83 in Baltimore
County.
2. Fines distributed to the State Highway Administration
under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph are supplemental to and are not intended
to take the place of funding that would otherwise be appropriated for uses described under
subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph.
(iii) Civil penalties resulting from citations issued using a speed
monitoring system controlled by the Maryland Transportation Authority that are collected
by the District Court shall be collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and
remitted to the Maryland Transportation Authority.
(4) (i) Except as provided in paragraphs (5) and (6) of this subsection,
from the fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems,
CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEMS, school bus monitoring cameras, bus lane
monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring
systems, school bus monitoring cameras, CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEMS, bus lane
monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including
pedestrian or highway safety programs.
10–311.
(a) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a traffic control signal
monitoring system in accordance with § 21–202.1 of the Transportation Article is
admissible in a proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a
violation of § 21–202(h) of the Transportation Article without authentication.

HOUSE BILL 1086 5
(b) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a speed monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–809 or § 21–810 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a
proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of Title 21,
Subtitle 8 of the Transportation Article without authentication.
(c) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a school bus monitoring
camera in accordance with § 21–706.1 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a
proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of § 21–706
of the Transportation Article without authentication.
(d) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a vehicle height monitoring
system in accordance with § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a
proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of a State or
local law restricting the presence of certain vehicles during certain times without
authentication.
(e) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a bus lane monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–1134 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a proceeding
concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of § 21–1133 of the
Transportation Article without authentication.
(f) A recorded image of a motor vehicle and any relevant recorded audio produced
by a noise abatement monitoring system in conjunction with a noise measuring device in
accordance with § 22–612 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a proceeding
concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of § 22–602 of the
Transportation Article without authentication.
(g) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a stop sign monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–707.1 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a proceeding
concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of § 21–707 of the
Transportation Article without authentication.
(h) A RECORDED IMAGE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE PRODUCED BY A CROSSWALK
MONITORING SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–502.2 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE IS ADMISSIBLE IN A PROCEEDING CONCERNING A CIVIL CITATION ISSUED
UNDER THAT SECTION FOR A VIOLATION OF § 21–502(A)(2) OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE WITHOUT AUTHENTICATION.
(I) In any other judicial proceeding, a recorded image produced by a vehicle
height monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring
system, work zone speed control system, stop sign monitoring system, CROSSWALK
MONITORING SYSTEM, school bus monitoring camera, or bus lane monitoring system or a
recorded image and any relevant recorded audio produced by a noise abatement monitoring
system in conjunction with a noise measuring device is admissible as otherwise provided
by law.

HOUSE BILL 1086
Article – Transportation
21–502.
(a) (1) This subsection does not apply where:
(i) A pedestrian tunnel or overhead pedestrian crossing is provided,
as described in § 21–503(b) of this subtitle; or
(ii) A traffic control signal is in operation.
(2) The driver of a vehicle shall come to a stop when a pedestrian crossing
the roadway in a crosswalk is:
(i) On the half of the roadway on which the vehicle is traveling; or
(ii) Approaching from an adjacent lane on the other half of the
roadway.
(b) A pedestrian may not suddenly leave a curb or other place of safety and walk
or run into the path of a vehicle which is so close that it is impossible for the driver to yield.
(c) If, at a marked crosswalk or at an unmarked crosswalk at an intersection, a
vehicle is stopped to let a pedestrian cross the roadway, the driver of any other vehicle
approaching from the rear may not overtake and pass the stopped vehicle.
(d) A person may not commit a violation of subsection (a) or (c) of this section that
contributes to an accident.
(e) A person convicted of a violation of subsection (d) of this section is subject to
imprisonment not exceeding 2 months or a fine not exceeding $1,000 or both.
21–502.2.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(B) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AGENCY” MEANS A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT IS
AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE A CITATION FOR A VIOLATION OF THE MARYLAND VEHICLE
LAW OR OF LOCAL TRAFFIC LAWS OR REGULATIONS.
(3) “CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEM” MEANS A DEVICE DESIGNED
TO CAPTURE A RECORDED IMAGE OF A VIOLATION.

HOUSE BILL 1086 7
(4) (I) “OWNER” MEANS THE REGISTERED OWNER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE OR LESSEE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER A LEASE OF 6 MONTHS OR MORE.
(II) “OWNER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A MOTOR VEHICLE LEASING COMPANY; OR
2. A HOLDER OF A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE
ISSUED UNDER TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 9, PART III OF THIS ARTICLE.
(5) “RECORDED IMAGE” MEANS IMAGES RECORDED BY A CROSSWALK
MONITORING SYSTEM:
(I) ON:
1. TWO OR MORE PHOTOGRAPHS;
2. TWO OR MORE MICROPHOTOGRAPHS;
3. TWO OR MORE ELECTRONIC IMAGES;
4. VIDEOTAPE; OR
5. ANY OTHER MEDIUM; AND
(II) SHOWING A MOTOR VEHICLE AND, ON AT LEAST ONE IMAGE
OR PORTION OF TAPE, CLEARLY IDENTIFYING THE REGISTRATION PLATE NUMBER
OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE.
(6) (I) “VIOLATION” MEANS A FAILURE TO COME TO A COMPLETE
STOP AT A CROSSWALK IN VIOLATION OF § 21–502(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) “VIOLATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY ACTION A DRIVER IS
INSTRUCTED TO TAKE BY A POLICE OFFICER.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) THROUGH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, AN AGENCY MAY USE CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEMS:
(I) ON HIGHWAYS LOCATED IN A SCHOOL ZONE MAINTAINED BY
A LOCAL JURISDICTION, IF AUTHORIZED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION; OR

HOUSE BILL 1086
(II) ON STATE HIGHWAYS LOCATED IN A SCHOOL ZONE, IF
AUTHORIZED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION.
(2) A CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEM:
(I) MAY NOT BE USED IN A LOCAL JURISDICTION UNDER THIS
SECTION UNLESS ITS USE IS AUTHORIZED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION BY LOCAL LAW ENACTED AFTER REASONABLE NOTICE AND A PUBLIC
HEARING; AND
(II) MAY BE USED ONLY AT A LOCATION APPROVED BY THE
MONTGOMERY COUNTY COUNCIL.
(3) THE COUNTY SHALL PRIORITIZE THE PLACEMENT OF CROSSWALK
MONITORING SYSTEMS WITHIN MUNICIPALITIES THAT HAVE HIGH VIOLATION
RATES.
(4) BEFORE BEGINNING USE OF CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEMS,
AN AGENCY SHALL PUBLISH NOTICE THAT THE AGENCY HAS ADOPTED THE USE OF
CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEMS ON ITS WEBSITE AND IN A NEWSPAPER OF
GENERAL CIRCULATION IN THE JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE CROSSWALK
MONITORING SYSTEM WILL BE USED.
(5) (I) THE COUNTY SHALL PROMINENTLY PLACE SIGNS ON
HIGHWAYS WITHIN THE COUNTY PROVIDING NOTICE THAT CROSSWALK
MONITORING SYSTEMS ARE USED IN THE COUNTY.
(II) THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION SHALL PLACE
SIGNS PROMINENTLY PROVIDING NOTICE THAT CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEMS
ARE IN USE ON STATE HIGHWAYS.
(D) A RECORDED IMAGE UNDER THIS SECTION INDICATING THAT THE
DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE HAS COMMITTED A VIOLATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE TIME AND DATE OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(2) TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE LOCATION OF THE VIOLATION.
(E) (1) UNLESS THE DRIVER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE RECEIVED A
CITATION FROM A POLICE OFFICER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER
OR, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F)(3) OR (H)(4) OR (5) OF THIS SECTION,
THE DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY IF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE IS RECORDED BY A CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEM DURING THE
COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION.

HOUSE BILL 1086 9
(2) A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT EXCEED $40.
(3) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL
PRESCRIBE:
(I) A UNIFORM CITATION FORM CONSISTENT WITH
SUBSECTION (F)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND § 7–302 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE; AND
(II) A CIVIL PENALTY, WHICH SHALL BE INDICATED ON THE
CITATION, TO BE PAID BY PERSONS WHO CHOOSE TO PREPAY THE CIVIL PENALTY
WITHOUT APPEARING IN DISTRICT COURT.
(F) (1) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPHS (2) THROUGH (5)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN AGENCY SHALL MAIL TO THE OWNER LIABLE UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION A CITATION THAT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE REGISTERED OWNER OF
THE VEHICLE;
(II) THE REGISTRATION NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE
INVOLVED IN THE VIOLATION;
(III) THE VIOLATION CHARGED;
(IV) TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE LOCATION OF THE
VIOLATION;
(V) THE DATE AND TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(VI) A COPY OF THE RECORDED IMAGE;
(VII) THE AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED AND THE
DATE BY WHICH THE CIVIL PENALTY MUST BE PAID;
(VIII) A SIGNED STATEMENT BY A TECHNICIAN EMPLOYED BY THE
AGENCY THAT, BASED ON THE INSPECTION OF THE RECORDED IMAGE, THE MOTOR
VEHICLE WAS BEING OPERATED DURING THE COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION;
(IX) A STATEMENT THAT THE RECORDED IMAGE IS EVIDENCE OF
A VIOLATION; AND
(X) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION:

HOUSE BILL 1086
1. OF THE MANNER AND TIME IN WHICH LIABILITY AS
ALLEGED IN THE CITATION MAY BE CONTESTED IN THE DISTRICT COURT; AND
2. THAT FAILURE TO PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY OR TO
CONTEST LIABILITY IN A TIMELY MANNER IS AN ADMISSION OF LIABILITY AND MAY
RESULT IN REFUSAL OR SUSPENSION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION.
(2) THE AGENCY MAY MAIL A WARNING NOTICE IN PLACE OF A
CITATION TO THE OWNER LIABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) (I) BEFORE MAILING A CITATION TO A MOTOR VEHICLE
RENTAL COMPANY LIABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, AN AGENCY
SHALL MAIL A NOTICE TO THE MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL COMPANY STATING THAT A
CITATION WILL BE MAILED TO THE MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL COMPANY UNLESS,
WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE NOTICE, THE MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL
COMPANY PROVIDES THE AGENCY WITH:
1. A STATEMENT MADE UNDER OATH THAT STATES THE
NAME AND LAST KNOWN MAILING ADDRESS OF THE INDIVIDUAL DRIVING OR
RENTING THE MOTOR VEHICLE WHEN THE VIOLATION OCCURRED;
2. A. A STATEMENT MADE UNDER OATH THAT
STATES THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL COMPANY IS UNABLE TO DETERMINE
WHO WAS DRIVING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME THE VIOLATION OCCURRED BECAUSE
THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS STOLEN AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
B. A COPY OF THE POLICE REPORT ASSOCIATED WITH
THE MOTOR VEHICLE THEFT CLAIMED UNDER ITEM A OF THIS ITEM; OR
3. PAYMENT FOR THE PENALTY ASSOCIATED WITH THE
VIOLATION.
(II) AN AGENCY MAY NOT MAIL A CITATION TO A MOTOR
VEHICLE RENTAL COMPANY LIABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION IF
THE MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL COMPANY COMPLIES WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH.
(4) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND SUBSECTION (H)(4) AND (5) OF THIS SECTION, A CITATION ISSUED UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2 WEEKS AFTER THE ALLEGED
VIOLATION.
(5) A PERSON WHO RECEIVES A CITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY:

HOUSE BILL 1086 11
(I) PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
INSTRUCTIONS ON THE CITATION; OR
(II) ELECT TO STAND TRIAL FOR THE ALLEGED VIOLATION.
(G) (1) A CERTIFICATE ALLEGING THAT A VIOLATION OCCURRED, SWORN
TO OR AFFIRMED BY A DULY AUTHORIZED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER EMPLOYED
BY OR UNDER CONTRACT WITH AN AGENCY, BASED ON THE INSPECTION OF A
RECORDED IMAGE, SHALL BE EVIDENCE OF THE FACTS CONTAINED IN THE
CERTIFICATE AND SHALL BE ADMISSIBLE IN ANY PROCEEDING CONCERNING THE
ALLEGED VIOLATION.
(2) ADJUDICATION OF LIABILITY SHALL BE BASED ON A
PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE.
(H) (1) THE DISTRICT COURT MAY CONSIDER IN DEFENSE OF A
VIOLATION:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THAT
THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR REGISTRATION PLATES OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE WERE
STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL
OR POSSESSION OF THE OWNER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE
VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(III) ANY OTHER ISSUES AND EVIDENCE THAT THE DISTRICT
COURT CONSIDERS PERTINENT.
(2) TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE
REGISTRATION PLATES WERE STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND
WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL OR POSSESSION OF THE OWNER AT THE TIME OF
THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER MUST SUBMIT PROOF THAT A POLICE REPORT ABOUT
THE STOLEN MOTOR VEHICLE OR REGISTRATION PLATES WAS FILED IN A TIMELY
MANNER.
(3) TO SATISFY THE EVIDENTIARY BURDEN UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION SHALL PROVIDE
TO THE DISTRICT COURT EVIDENCE TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE DISTRICT
COURT OF WHO WAS OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION,
INCLUDING, AT A MINIMUM, THE OPERATOR’S NAME AND CURRENT ADDRESS.

HOUSE BILL 1086
(4) (I) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS PARAGRAPH APPLY ONLY TO A
CITATION THAT INVOLVES A CLASS E (TRUCK) VEHICLE WITH A REGISTERED GROSS
WEIGHT OF 26,001 POUNDS OR MORE, CLASS F (TRACTOR) VEHICLE, CLASS G
(TRAILER) VEHICLE OPERATED IN COMBINATION WITH A CLASS F (TRACTOR)
VEHICLE, OR CLASS P (PASSENGER BUS) VEHICLE.
(II) TO SATISFY THE EVIDENTIARY BURDEN UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PERSON NAMED IN A CITATION
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY PROVIDE TO THE
DISTRICT COURT A LETTER, SWORN TO OR AFFIRMED BY THE PERSON AND MAILED
BY CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, THAT:
1. STATES THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION
WAS NOT OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
2. PROVIDES THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND DRIVER’S
LICENSE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OF THE PERSON WHO WAS OPERATING THE
VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(5) (I) IF THE DISTRICT COURT FINDS THAT THE PERSON NAMED
IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE
VIOLATION OR RECEIVES EVIDENCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (4)(II)2 OF THIS
SUBSECTION IDENTIFYING THE PERSON DRIVING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE
VIOLATION, THE CLERK OF COURT SHALL PROVIDE TO THE AGENCY ISSUING THE
CITATION A COPY OF ANY EVIDENCE SUBSTANTIATING WHO WAS OPERATING THE
VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(II) ON RECEIPT OF SUBSTANTIATING EVIDENCE FROM THE
DISTRICT COURT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE AGENCY
MAY ISSUE A CITATION AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION TO THE
PERSON WHO THE EVIDENCE INDICATES WAS OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME
OF THE VIOLATION.
(III) A CITATION ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2 WEEKS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE
EVIDENCE FROM THE DISTRICT COURT.
(I) IF THE CIVIL PENALTY IS NOT PAID AND THE VIOLATION IS NOT
CONTESTED, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY REFUSE TO REGISTER OR REREGISTER OR
MAY SUSPEND THE REGISTRATION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE.
(J) A VIOLATION FOR WHICH A CIVIL PENALTY IS IMPOSED UNDER THIS
SECTION:

HOUSE BILL 1086 13
(1) IS NOT A MOVING VIOLATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSESSING
POINTS UNDER § 16–402 OF THIS ARTICLE AND MAY NOT BE RECORDED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION ON THE DRIVING RECORD OF THE OWNER OR DRIVER OF THE
VEHICLE; AND
(2) MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED IN THE PROVISION OF MOTOR VEHICLE
INSURANCE COVERAGE.
(K) IN CONSULTATION WITH LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES, THE CHIEF
JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES FOR THE ISSUANCE
OF CITATIONS, TRIALS FOR VIOLATIONS, AND THE COLLECTION OF CIVIL PENALTIES
IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(L) (1) AN AGENCY OR AN AGENT OR A CONTRACTOR DESIGNATED BY THE
AGENCY SHALL ADMINISTER AND PROCESS CIVIL CITATIONS ISSUED UNDER THIS
SECTION IN COORDINATION WITH THE DISTRICT COURT.
(2) IF A CONTRACTOR IN ANY MANNER OPERATES A CROSSWALK
MONITORING SYSTEM OR ADMINISTERS OR PROCESSES CITATIONS GENERATED BY
A CROSSWALK MONITORING SYSTEM ON BEHALF OF A LOCAL JURISDICTION, THE
CONTRACTOR’S FEE MAY NOT BE CONTINGENT ON A PER–TICKET BASIS ON THE
NUMBER OF CITATIONS ISSUED OR PAID.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2027, the Montgomery County Department of Transportation shall report to the Governor
and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly
on:
(1) through October 1, 2027:
(i) the time period during which crosswalk monitoring systems were
in use in the county; and
(ii) the number of warnings and citations issued as a result of
violations recorded by a crosswalk monitoring system in the county over the reported time
period, by location and date;
(2) (i) the costs associated with implementing and operating crosswalk
monitoring systems; and
(ii) the revenue collected on a monthly basis as a result of violations
recorded by crosswalk monitoring systems;
(3) appropriate locations for the deployment of crosswalk monitoring
systems;

HOUSE BILL 1086
(4) the performance and reliability of crosswalk monitoring systems used
by the county; and
(5) the effectiveness of crosswalk monitoring systems in reducing
violations, crashes, and pedestrian injuries in the county generally and in areas where the
crosswalk monitoring systems were implemented and used.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of June 30, 2031,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.